District of Columbia statutes.
48-1202

Identification of offenders.

(a)

A person who is stopped by a police officer for violating § 48-1201 shall, upon request, inform the officer of his or her name and address for the purpose of including that information on a notice of violation; provided, that no person shall be required to possess or display any documentary proof of his or her name or address in order to comply with the requirements of this section.

(b)

A person who refuses to provide his or her name and address, or who knowingly provides an incorrect name or address, to a police officer in violation of subsection (a) of this section shall, upon conviction, be fined $100.

July 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-126, § 102, 61 DCR 3482
This section is referenced in § 48-1203.